Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF958.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2561YH (3) 91 jm/jh H.F. 958 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 422.10C Premarital counseling tax 1 credit. 2 1. As used in this section, âpremarital counselingâ means 3 the application of counseling techniques upon prospective 4 spouses in preparation of marriage. 5 2. The taxes imposed under this subchapter, less the credits 6 allowed under section 422.12, shall be reduced by a premarital 7 counseling credit equal to the cost of premarital counseling, 8 not to exceed five hundred dollars. 9 3. An individual may claim the tax credit allowed a 10 partnership, limited liability company, S corporation, estate, 11 or trust electing to have the income taxed directly to the 12 individual. The amount claimed by the individual shall be 13 based upon the pro rata share of the individualâs earnings of 14 the partnership, limited liability company, S corporation, 15 estate, or trust. 16 4. Any credit in excess of the taxpayerâs tax liability 17 for the tax year is not refundable but the excess for the tax 18 year may be credited to the tax liability for the following tax 19 year. 20 Sec. 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 21 retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years beginning on 22 or after that date. 23